North Carolina statutes. Chapter 114. Department of Justice.
Article 4. State Bureau of Investigation.

Part 1. General Powers and Duties of the State Bureau of Investigation.

§ 114-12.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-915

by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(j), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 114-12.1.
Minority sensitivity training for law enforcement personnel. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Department of Justice shall develop guidelines for minority sensitivity training for all law enforcement personnel throughout the State. The Department shall ensure that all persons who work with minority juveniles in the juvenile justice system are taught how to communicate effectively with minority juveniles and how to recognize and address the needs of those juveniles. The Department shall also advise all law enforcement and professionals who work within the juvenile justice system of ways to improve the treatment of minority juveniles so that all juveniles receive equal treatment. Except where local law enforcement has existing minority sensitivity training that meets the Department guidelines, the Department shall conduct the minority sensitivity training annually. Prior to the training each year, the Department shall assess whether minorities are receiving fair and equal treatment in the juvenile justice system with regard to the administration of predisposition procedures, of diversion methods, of dispositional alternatives, and of treatment and post-release supervision plans.

The Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall ensure that all juvenile court counselors and other Division personnel receive the minority sensitivity training specified in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

1998-202, s. 17; 2000-137, s. 4(i); 2003-214, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2017-186, s. 2(wwww).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 114-12.1

.

§ 114-12.1.
Minority sensitivity training for law enforcement personnel. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Department of Justice shall develop guidelines for minority sensitivity training for all law enforcement personnel throughout the State. The Department shall ensure that all persons who work with minority juveniles in the juvenile justice system are taught how to communicate effectively with minority juveniles and how to recognize and address the needs of those juveniles. The Department shall also advise all law enforcement and professionals who work within the juvenile justice system of ways to improve the treatment of minority juveniles so that all juveniles receive equal treatment. Except where local law enforcement has existing minority sensitivity training that meets the Department guidelines, the Department shall conduct the minority sensitivity training annually. Prior to the training each year, the Department shall assess whether minorities are receiving fair and equal treatment in the juvenile justice system with regard to the administration of predisposition procedures, of diversion methods, of dispositional alternatives, and of treatment and post-release supervision plans.

The Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall ensure that all juvenile court counselors and other Division personnel receive the minority sensitivity training specified in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

1998-202, s. 17; 2000-137, s. 4(i); 2003-214, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2017-186, s. 2(wwww); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 114-12.1

.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the main volume.

§ 114-13.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(f), effective July 1, 2014.

History.

1937, c. 349, s. 4; 1939, c. 315, s. 6; 1955, c. 1185, s. 1; 1957, c. 269, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1272, s. 3; 2003-214, s. 1(1); 2011-145, s. 19.1(q1); 2011-391, s. 43(g); repealed by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(f), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 114-14.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-917

by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(j), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 114-14.1.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-918

by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(j), effective July 1, 2014.

§§ 114-15 through 114-15.3.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-919

through 143B-922 by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(j), effective July 1, 2014.

§§ 114-16 through 114-16.2.

Recodified as Article 9 of Chapter 114,

G.S. 114-60

through 114-62, by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 17.6(d), effective July 1, 2013.

§ 114-17.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-923

by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(j), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 114-17.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 507, s. 6.

§ 114-18.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-924

by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(j), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 114-18.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-119, s. 6, effective December 1, 2000.

Cross References.

As to duty of local and State law enforcement agencies to report, within 48 hours, seizures of unauthorized substances and arrests for possession of unauthorized substances, see G.S. 105-113.108(b).

§ 114-19.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-906

by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(k), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 114-19.01.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-925

by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(
l
), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 114-19.1.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-930

by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(m), effective July 1, 2014.

§§ 114-19.2 through 114-19.34.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-931

through 143B-965 by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(m), effective July 1, 2014.

§§ 114-19.35 through 114-19.49.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-966

through 143B-980 by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(m), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 114-19.50.

Recodified as

G.S. 143B-981

by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(m), effective July 1, 2014.

§§ 114-20,
114-20.1.

Recodified as Subpart E of Part 4 of Article 13 of Chapter 143B,

G.S. 143B-986

and

G.S. 143B-987

, by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(n), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 114-21.

Recodified as

G.S. 114-12.1

by Session Laws 2003-214, s. 1(4), effective June 19, 2003.

§§ 114-22 through 114-25.

Reserved for future codification purposes.